Tennessee, session 114, HB1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302(a), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(8) A switch or auto sear device designed, made, or intended for use in
converting a weapon to shoot automatically more than one (1) shot, without manual
reloading, by a single function or pull of the trigger.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302(d), is amended by
deleting "(a)(3) or (a)(4)" and substituting "(a)(3) or (a)(8)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1302(f), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(5) An offense under subdivision (a)(8) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1082
003173
- 1 -